Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.500

Health care services practice indicators and risk management protocols.

The department of health shall consult with health care providers and facilities, purchasers, health professional regulatory authorities under RCW 18.130.040, appropriate research and clinical experts, and consumers of health care services to identify specific practice areas where practice indicators and risk management protocols have been developed, including those that have been demonstrated to be effective among persons of color. Practice indicators shall be based upon expert consensus and best available scientific evidence. The department shall:

(1) Develop a definition of expert consensus and best available scientific evidence so that practice indicators can serve as a standard for excellence in the provision of health care services.

(2) Establish a process to identify and evaluate practice indicators and risk management protocols as they are developed by the appropriate professional, scientific, and clinical communities.

(3) Recommend the use of practice indicators and risk management protocols in quality assurance, utilization review, or provider payment to the health services commission.

[ 1993 c 492 s 410.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.